Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-113.03
County board; general duties.

The county board shall have power as a board, or as individuals, to perform such other duties as may from time to time be imposed by general law.

Laws 1943, c. 57, § 1(14), p. 227;

R.S.1943, § 23-116.02;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-116.02.